Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2627YH (2) 91 jda/jh H.F. 447 Section 1. Section 298.4, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. To pay the costs of installing and 3 operating school safety and security infrastructure, including 4 weapons detection systems and door monitoring systems. 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. To pay the costs of employing school 6 security personnel. 7 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 8 years beginning on or after July 1, 2025. 9